Massachusetts, session 194th, H3376.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 23A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 13U the 
following section:-  
Section 13V. (a) There shall be established a commission on Massachusetts-Poland Trade 
within the international trade office which shall advance and promote the economic interests of, 
and strengthen the relationship between, the Commonwealth and the Republic of Poland. The 
commission shall study, research and advance analyses, and make recommendations to: (i) 
advance the bilateral trade and investments between the Commonwealth and the Republic of 
Poland; (ii) initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to the Commonwealth and 
Republic of Poland; (iii) promote business and academic exchanges between the Commonwealth 
and the Republic of Poland; (iv) encourage mutual economic support between; (v) further 
investments in the infrastructure of the Commonwealth and the Republic of Poland; (vi) aid 
communities in the Commonwealth and the Republic of Poland through the creation of economic 

of 3 13 and educational opportunities, and; (vii) address such other issues as the commission deems 
necessary.  
(b) The commission shall consist of the following 21 members: 6 past or current 
members of the house of representatives, 5 of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the 
house and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the minority leader of the house, 6 past or current 
members of the senate, 5 of whom shall be appointed by the senate president and 1 of whom 
shall be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 6 members appointed by the governor, 1 
of whom shall be the Polish consul general to New England, or a designee, 1 of whom shall be 
the secretary of the Commonwealth, or a designee, 1 of whom shall be the secretary of economic 
development, or a designee, 3 of whom shall be from an institute of higher education, but shall 
not be affiliated with the same institution; and 3 of whom shall be appointed from a list of no less 
than 5 persons submitted to the Governor by the Polish consul general to New England, all of 
whom shall be from a public organization promoting Polish American affairs, but shall not be 
affiliated with the same organization. All commission members shall be persons with knowledge 
of or current or past involvement in organizations that promote Polish American affairs or shall 
have interest in the well-being of trade relations between the Commonwealth and Republic of 
Poland.  
The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but 
shall be reimbursed for any unusual and customary expenses incurred in the performance of their 
duties. Members shall be considered special state employees for the purposes of chapter 268A.  
The commission shall elect from among its members a chair, a vice chair, a treasurer, and 
any other officers it deems necessary.  

of 3 35  The commission shall hold meetings at the places it designates throughout the state  
A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the 
transaction of business of the commission.  
(c) The commission shall annually report its findings together with recommendations for 
legislation, if any, to the governor, speaker of the house, senate president, the secretary of 
economic development no later than August 31st for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The 
report shall be in writing and include recommendations as deemed appropriate by the 
commission to effectuate its purpose, as provided by this section.